
DI−44 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LANDCRUISER(W/G)SUP(RM73 1E)

DTC C 1207 / 37 Neutral Start Switch Circuit
(P/R Range)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

C1207 /37

Whenanyof the following 1. through3. isdetected:
1.Atvehiclespeedof 15km/h (9mph)or lessand the

conditions that open circuit signal of P signal circuit of
neutral start switch isONand thevoltageof IG 1 terminal
is9.5V to 17Vcontinue for5sec.ormore.

2.Atvehiclespeedof 15km/h (9mph)ormore,andwhen
thecondition thatPsignal fromneutral start switch is
ON,and the theshift leverposition information fromthe
engine and ECT ECU is other than in P or N range con-
tinues for 60 sec. or more.

3.Atvehiclespeedof 15km/h (9mph)or lessand the
conditions that open circuit signal of P signal circuit of
neutral start switch isONand thevoltageof IG 1 terminal
is9.5V to 17Vcontinue for5sec.ormore.

SNeutral start switch
SNeutral start switchcircuit (P/Rrange)
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R−L

3

1

1

RB
RL

PL

IN1

4

R−L

G−W
G−W G−WC C

R−B
20

IN1 IG4
R−B

4
IN3

J9(*2)

4
R−B

IG4
19 5

A53

A53

R

P

B

Engine Room J/B

1
2 1

2 1

1
1F 1O

IG1 No. 1 Relay AM1 No. 1

Cowl Side J/B LH

GAUGE2
2D 2H B

ALT

FL Block
2

Battery

ABS & BA & TRC
& VSC ECU

1

LHD:

J10(*1)

J/C

G−W

N1N3
7

N3N1

N3N1
8

(*1) (*2)

(*1) (*2)

(*1) (*2)

2 8

*1:General,G.C.C
*2: Europe

−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−45

LANDCRUISER(W/G)SUP(RM73 1E)

WIRING DIAGRAM
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Neutral Start Switch
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check neutral start switch (P/R range).

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Disconnect the neutral start switch connector.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal shown below when the
shift lever is moved to each range.
OK:

P range Terminals 1 − 3 Continuity

R range Terminals2 − 3 Continuity

NG Replace neutral start switch.

OK

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between terminals P
and R of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and battery (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


